Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.095

Extent and duration of treatment.

Upon the occurrence of any injury to a victim eligible for compensation under the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services using his or her private or public insurance or if no insurance, using a provider of his or her own choice. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be limited in point of duration as follows:

(1) No treatment shall be provided once the victim has received the maximum compensation under this chapter.

(2) In case of temporary disability, treatment shall not extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease. After any injured victim has returned to his or her work, his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so long as, such continuation is determined by the director to be necessary to his or her recovery, and as long as the victim has not received the maximum compensation under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 346 s 507.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.